Illinois, session 104th, HB3119.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prairie State Infrastructure Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Company" means a for-profit sole proprietorship, 8organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 9venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 10or limited liability company, including a wholly owned 11subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or 12affiliate of those entities or business associations that 13exists to make a profit.14    "Critical infrastructure" means a communication 15infrastructure system, cybersecurity system, electric grid, 16hazardous waste treatment system, or water treatment facility.17    "Cybersecurity" means the measures taken to protect a 18computer, computer network, computer system, or other 19technology infrastructure against unauthorized use or access. 20    Section 10. Designation of a threat to critical 21infrastructure. 22    (a) The Governor may designate a country as a threat to   HB3119- 2 -LRB104 10042 HLH 20113 b1critical infrastructure in consultation with the Director of 2the Illinois State Police.3    (b) The Governor may consult with the Director of the 4Illinois Emergency Management Agency to assess a threat to 5critical infrastructure under this Act. 6    Section 15. Prohibition on contracts with certain 7foreign-owned companies in connection with critical 8infrastructure. 9    (a) A business entity in this State may not enter into a 10contract or other agreement relating to critical 11infrastructure in this State with a company if:12        (1) the company, under the contract or agreement, 13    would be able to directly or remotely access or control 14    critical infrastructure in this State; and15        (2) the company is:16            (A) owned by or the majority of stock or other 17        ownership interest of the company is held or 18        controlled by:19                (i) individuals who are citizens of China, 20            Iran, North Korea, Russia, or a country designated 21            as a threat under Section 10; or22                (ii) a company or other entity, including a 23            governmental entity, that is owned or controlled 24            by citizens of or is directly controlled by the 25            government of China, Iran, North Korea, Russia, or   HB3119- 3 -LRB104 10042 HLH 20113 b1            a country designated as a threat under 10; or2            (B) headquartered in China, Iran, North Korea, 3        Russia, or a country designated as a threat under 4        Section 10.5    (b) The prohibition described in subsection (a) applies 6regardless of whether:7        (1) the company's or its parent company's securities 8    are publicly traded; or9        (2) the company or its parent company is listed as a 10    Chinese, Iranian, North Korean, or Russian company on a 11    public stock exchange. 12    Section 90. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 13adding Section 50-36.5 as follows: 14    (30 ILCS 500/50-36.5 new)15    Sec. 50-36.5. Prohibition on contracts with certain 16foreign-owned companies in connection with critical 17infrastructure.18    (a) As used in this Section:19    "Company" means a for-profit sole proprietorship, 20organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 21venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 22or limited liability company, including a wholly owned 23subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or 24affiliate of those entities or business associations that   HB3119- 4 -LRB104 10042 HLH 20113 b1exists to make a profit.2    "Critical infrastructure" means a communication 3infrastructure system, cybersecurity system, electric grid, 4hazardous waste treatment system, or water treatment facility.5    "Cybersecurity" means the measures taken to protect a 6computer, computer network, computer system, or other 7technology infrastructure against unauthorized use or access.8    "Governmental entity" means a State agency or political 9subdivision of this State.10    (b) A governmental entity may not enter into a contract or 11other agreement relating to critical infrastructure in this 12State with a company that is:13        (1) owned by or the majority of stock or other 14    ownership interest of the company is held or controlled 15    by:16            (A) individuals who are citizens of China, Iran, 17        North Korea, Russia, or a country designated as a 18        threat under Section 10 of the Prairie State 19        Infrastructure Protection Act; or20            (B) a company or other entity, including a 21        governmental entity, that is owned or controlled by 22        citizens of or is directly controlled by the 23        government of China, Iran, North Korea, Russia, or a 24        country designated as a threat under Section 10 of the 25        Prairie State Infrastructure Protection Act; or26        (2) headquartered in China, Iran, North Korea, Russia,   HB3119- 5 -LRB104 10042 HLH 20113 b1    or a country designated as a threat under Section 10 of the 2    Prairie State Infrastructure Protection Act.3    (c) The prohibition described in subsection (b) applies 4regardless of whether:5        (1) the company's or its parent company's securities 6    are publicly traded; or7        (2) the company or its parent company is listed as a 8    Chinese, Iranian, North Korean, or Russian company on a 9    public stock exchange.